basic-cs.aff
FLAG long
SFX U1 Y 61
SFX U1   ec          ce         ec       
SFX U1   ec          ci         ec       
SFX U1   ec          če         ec       
SFX U1   ec          cem        ec       
SFX U1   ec          ců         ec       
SFX U1   ec          cům        ec       
SFX U1   ec          cích       ec       
SFX U1   0           e          [^e]c       
SFX U1   0           i          [^e]c       
SFX U1   0           em         [^e]c       
SFX U1   0           ů          [^e]c       
SFX U1   0           ům         [^e]c       
SFX U1   0           ích        [^e]c       
SFX U1   0           e          [^acďeňť]       
SFX U1   0           i          [^acďeňťi]       
SFX U1   0           ovi        [^acďeňť]       
SFX U1   0           em         [^acďeňť]       
SFX U1   0           ů          [^aceň]       
SFX U1   0           ům         [^aceň]       
SFX U1   0           ích        [^acďeňťsx]       
SFX U1   0           ech        [sx]       
SFX U1   0           y          x       
SFX U1   a           e          a       
SFX U1   a           ovi        a       
SFX U1   a           em         a       
SFX U1   a           ové        a       
SFX U1   a           ů          a       
SFX U1   a           ům         a       
SFX U1   a           i          a       
SFX U1   a           ích        a       
SFX U1   ď           dě         ď       
SFX U1   ď           di         ď       
SFX U1   ď           děm        ď       
SFX U1   ď           dích       ď       
SFX U1   ň           ně         leň       
SFX U1   ň           ni         leň       
SFX U1   ň           něm        leň       
SFX U1   0           ů          leň       
SFX U1   0           ům         leň       
SFX U1   ň           ních       leň       
SFX U1   eň          ně         [^l]eň       
SFX U1   eň          ni         [^l]eň       
SFX U1   eň          něm        [^l]eň       
SFX U1   eň          ňů         [^l]eň       
SFX U1   eň          ňům        [^l]eň       
SFX U1   eň          ních       [^l]eň       
SFX U1   ň           ně         [^e]ň       
SFX U1   ň           ni         [^e]ň       
SFX U1   ň           něm        [^e]ň       
SFX U1   0           ů          [^e]ň       
SFX U1   0           ům         [^e]ň       
SFX U1   ň           ních       [^e]ň       
SFX U1   ť           tě         ť       
SFX U1   ť           ti         ť       
SFX U1   ť           těm        ť       
SFX U1   ť           tích       ť       
SFX U1   e           i          e       
SFX U1   0           m          e       
SFX U1   e           ů          e       
SFX U1   e           ům         e       
SFX U1   e           ích        e       

SFX U2 Y 7
SFX U2   c          e         c
SFX U2   c          i         ec
SFX U2   c          em         ec
SFX U2   c          ové        ec
SFX U2   c          ů          ec
SFX U2   c          ům         ec
SFX U2   c          ích        ec


SFX D1 Y 68
SFX D1   es          a          es
SFX D1   es          u          es
SFX D1   es          ovi        es
SFX D1   es          e          [^ghk]es
SFX D1   es          em         es
SFX D1   es          ové        es
SFX D1   es          ů          es
SFX D1   es          ům         es
SFX D1   es          ech        [^ighk]es
SFX D1   es          y          [^i]es
SFX D1   es          ích        ies
SFX D1   es          ách        kes
SFX D1   es          i          ies
SFX D1   és          a          és
SFX D1   és          u          és
SFX D1   és          ovi        és
SFX D1   és          e          [^ghk]és
SFX D1   és          em         és
SFX D1   és          ové        és
SFX D1   és          ů          és
SFX D1   és          ům         és
SFX D1   és          ech        [^ighk]és
SFX D1   és          y          [^i]és
SFX D1   és          ích        iés
SFX D1   és          ách        kés
SFX D1   és          i          iés
SFX D1   os          a          os
SFX D1   os          u          os
SFX D1   os          ovi        os
SFX D1   os          e          [^ghk]os
SFX D1   os          em         os
SFX D1   os          ové        os
SFX D1   os          ů          os
SFX D1   os          ům         os
SFX D1   os          ech        [^ighk]os
SFX D1   os          y          [^i]os
SFX D1   os          ích        ios
SFX D1   os          ách        kos
SFX D1   os          i          ios
SFX D1   us          a          us
SFX D1   us          u          us
SFX D1   us          ovi        us
SFX D1   us          e          [^ghk]us
SFX D1   us          em         us
SFX D1   us          ové        us
SFX D1   us          ů          us
SFX D1   us          ům         us
SFX D1   us          ech        [^eik]us
SFX D1   us          y          [^ei]us
SFX D1   us          ích        [ei]us
SFX D1   us          ách        kus
SFX D1   us          i          [ei]us
SFX D1   0           é          [^eou]s
SFX D1   0           é          [^asy]
SFX D1   a           é          a
SFX D1   ky          ek         [aeiouyáéíóúůýě][lr]ky
SFX D1   y           0          [^aeiouyáéíóúůýě][lr]ky
SFX D1   ky          ek         [čdntv]ky
SFX D1   y           0          [^čdntvrl]ky
SFX D1   ly          el         [dkpz]ly
SFX D1   y           0          [^dkpz]ly
SFX D1   y           0          [^kl]y
SFX D1   y           ům         y
SFX D1   y           ách        [gh]y
SFX D1   y           ách        ky
SFX D1   y           ách        ry
SFX D1   y           ech        [^ghkr]y
SFX D1   y           ích        [sz]y

SFX H1 Y 24
SFX H1   0           u          [^ey]
SFX H1   0           e          [^eyghkc]
SFX H1   0           em         [^ey]
SFX H1   0           y          [^ey]
SFX H1   0           ů          [^ey]
SFX H1   0           ům         [^ey]
SFX H1   0           ech        [^eyghk]
SFX H1   g           zích       g
SFX H1   h           zích       [^c]h
SFX H1   ch          ších       ch
SFX H1   k           cích       k
SFX H1   e           u          e
SFX H1   0           m          e
SFX H1   e           y          e
SFX H1   e           ů          e
SFX H1   e           ům         e
SFX H1   e           ech        e
SFX H1   y           ů          y
SFX H1   y           ům         y
SFX H1   y           ech        [^ghk]y
SFX H1   gy          zích       gy
SFX H1   hy          zích       [^c]hy
SFX H1   chy         ších       chy
SFX H1   ky          cích       ky
