basic-cs.dic
agroplast/H1
aktivista/P1D1XD
akát/H1
alchymista/P1D1XD
alexis/U1V1XD
amadeus/D1
ambit/H1
anarchista/P1D1XD
andrej/U1V1XD
angličan/P1D1XD
antigen/H1
antikomunista/P1D1I1XD
apoštol/P1V1D1XD
archetyp/H1
argentinec/U1XD
aristokrat/P1D1I1XD
artista/P1D1XD
astronaut/P1I1D1XD
atak/H1
augustus/D1
autodrom/H1
automobilista/P1D1XD
aviv/H1
badmintonista/P1D1XD
bakus/U1V1XD
baldachýn/H1
banjista/P1D1XD
bankrot/H1
baroš/U1V1XD
barytonista/P1D1XD
basketbalista/P1D1XD
batoh/H1
bednář/U1XD
belgičan/P1D1I1XD
beskydy/D1Z1Q1
beton/H1R1
birmingham/H1
bis/U1V1XD
blšany/D1
bodák/H1
bohemista/P1D1XD
boháč/U1XD
boom/H1
bosonohy/D1Z1Q1
boss/U1V1XD
bratranec/U1XD
brloh/H1
brontosaurus/D1Q1
buchenwald/H1
buddhista/P1D1XD
buditel/U1D1XD
budovatel/U1D1XD
bus/U1V1XD
buzuluk/H1
březolupy/D1
cagaš/U1V1XD
caracas/H1
celsius/D1
cer/H1
charms/U1V1XD
chartista/P1D1XD
chlorid/H1
chocerady/D1
chovanec/U1XD
chovatel/U1D1XD
chroust/H1P1I1XD
citroen/H1
cizinec/U1XD
cork/H1
ctitel/U1D1XD
cyklista/P1D1XD
cyrus/U1V1XD
dabing/H1
dekodér/P1I1H1XD
demokrat/P1D1I1XD
detektor/H1
diktát/H1R1
diplomat/P1D1I1XD
diskař/U1XD
dobyvatel/U1D1XD
dodavatel/U1D1XD
dohled/H1
dopisovatel/U1D1XD
dopravník/H1
doručitel/U1D1XD
doručovatel/U1D1XD
dotek/H1
dražitel/U1D1XD
drn/H1
drtič/S1U1XD
držitel/U1D1XD
dubňany/D1
dvojplošník/H1
dvořan/P1D1XD
dědic/U1V1XD
dřevořez/H1
edmonton/H1
edwards/U1V1XD
elitex/H1
esejista/P1D1XD
essen/H1
evans/U1V1XD
evropan/P1D1XD
exkomunista/P1D1I1XD
experiment/H1
externista/P1D1XD
extrémista/P1D1XD
farizeus/D1
fascikl/H1
fašista/P1D1I1XD
fenič/U1V1XD
filatelista/P1D1XD
fleret/H1
florbalista/P1D1XD
fosfor/H1
fotbalista/P1D1XD
francouz/P1V1U1XD
frýdlant/H1R1
fuks/U1V1XD
futurista/P1D1XD
gardista/P1D1XD
gay/U1V1XD
gel/H1
germanista/P1D1XD
gong/H1
grandhotel/U1D1XD
gulden/H1
gymnazista/P1D1XD
haiťan/P1D1I1XD
handicap/H1
hanuš/U1V1XD
havajec/U1XD
hemoglobin/H1
heš/U1V1XD
hlasatel/U1D1XD
hlemýžď/U1XD
hnát/H1I1
hokejbalista/P1D1XD
holič/U1XD
hospic/H1S1
hostitel/U1D1XD
houbař/U1XD
hrobař/U1XD
hubertus/H1
humanista/P1D1XD
hvězdář/U1XD
hypermarket/H1
idealista/P1D1XD
implantát/H1
indonésan/P1D1XD
insekticid/H1
inzerát/H1
iráčan/P1D1XD
izraelec/U1XD
jantar/H1
januš/U1V1XD
jednatel/U1D1XD
jednorožec/U1XD
jerevan/H1
jidáš/U1V1XD
jonáš/U1V1XD
joule/H1
judista/P1D1XD
jános/U1V1XD
kajetán/H1
kameš/U1V1XD
kanton/H1
kapitalista/P1D1XD
karibik/H1
katecheta/P1D1I1XD
kationt/H1
kerouac/U1V1XD
kibuc/H1
klarinet/H1
klatovy/D1
kmen/H1S1
kněz/U1XD
kokršpaněl/P1D1XD
kolář/U1XD
komfort/H1
komunista/P1D1I1N1XD
konkurs/H1
kop/H1
korejec/U1XD
korutany/D1
kotlík/H1
kovačevič/U1V1XD
krajinář/U1XD
kriminalista/P1D1XD
kronikář/U1XD
krvák/H1
kubec/U1V1XD
kulturista/P1D1XD
kunc/U1V1XD
kvintet/H1
kytovec/U1XD
labourista/P1D1XD
lak/H1
lamač/U1XD
lewis/U1V1XD
ležák/H1
litevec/U1XD
lobbista/P1D1XD
lotyš/U1V1XD
lukeš/U1V1XD
lumen/H1
luštitel/U1D1XD
léčitel/U1D1XD
makléř/U1XD
maloodběratel/U1D1XD
mandl/H1
marcos/U1V1XD
martinec/U1V1XD
marťan/P1D1XD
mazač/U1V1XD
megabit/H1
michalec/U1V1XD
mikrogram/H1
miliardář/U1XD
mimozemšťan/P1D1XD
mitáč/U1V1XD
moment/H1R1
monarchista/P1D1XD
moravec/U1V1XD
moskvan/P1D1I1XD
mrakodrap/H1
multiinstrumentalista/P1D1XD
multimilionář/U1XD
míšenec/U1XD
nabyvatel/U1D1XD
nakladatel/U1D1XD
narušitel/U1D1XD
negativ/H1
nenechavec/U1XD
nikolaj/U1V1XD
ničitel/U1D1XD
nominál/H1
nosorožec/U1XD
novozélanďan/P1D1XD
nákres/H1
nástupce/U1XD
názor/H1
objevitel/U1D1XD
obyvatel/U1D1XD
obývák/H1
ochránce/U1XD
odesílatel/U1D1XD
odpis/H1
odpírač/U1XD
olymp/H1
ondráš/U1V1XD
orientalista/P1D1XD
oslavenec/U1XD
otužilec/U1XD
otáčkoměr/H1
ověřovatel/U1D1XD
padrnos/U1V1XD
padělatel/U1D1XD
parapet/H1
parléř/U1V1XD
pařížan/P1D1XD
pelc/U1V1XD
peloton/H1
pečovatel/U1D1XD
piskoř/U1XD
piškot/H1
plynař/U1XD
plát/H1J1N1
podbořany/D1
pohan/P1D1I1XD
pohon/H1
pojistitel/U1D1XD
pomník/H1
populista/P1D1XD
poradce/U1XD
postřik/H1
povstalec/U1XD
pozemšťan/P1D1XD
prapor/H1
pražan/P1D1I1XD
preis/U1V1XD
prodavač/U1XD
proslov/H1
protagonista/P1D1XD
protihráč/U1XD
průchod/H1R1
pulec/U1XD
puls/H1
pučista/P1D1XD
písničkář/U1XD
předplatitel/U1D1XD
představitel/U1D1XD
předěl/H1
přečin/H1
přidělenec/U1XD
přihlašovatel/U1D1XD
příznivec/U1XD
přízrak/H1
rasista/P1D1XD
rastr/H1
reformista/P1D1XD
remiáš/U1V1XD
reproduktor/H1
ropovod/H1
ross/U1V1XD
rozpad/H1
ručitel/U1D1XD
rybíz/H1
ráž/U1V1XD
sanders/U1V1XD
sandál/H1
satan/P1D1XD
scénárista/P1D1XD
sekeráš/U1V1XD
semtex/H1
silon/H1
sionista/P1D1XD
skladatel/U1D1XD
skřek/H1
slezan/P1D1I1XD
smečař/U1XD
smysl/H1N1
socialista/P1D1XD
soukmenovec/U1XD
soustruh/H1
spartakus/D1
spisovatel/U1D1XD
spolumajitel/U1D1XD
spoluvězeň/U1V1XD
spoluzakladatel/U1D1XD
stah/H1
stankovič/U1V1XD
stavitel/U1D1XD
stopař/U1XD
striptýz/H1
strůjce/U1V1XD
středoevropan/P1D1XD
subdodavatel/U1D1XD
sulc/H1
svěřenec/U1XD
swing/H1
syřan/P1D1I1XD
tancoš/U1V1XD
taxametr/H1
technokrat/P1D1I1XD
testament/H1
teč/U1V1XD
tibeťan/P1D1I1XD
topol/H1
tovaryš/U1XD
triangl/H1
tulipán/H1
tupesy/D1
tyc/U1V1XD
uhlík/H1
uhlíř/U1XD
ultranacionalista/P1D1XD
učenec/U1XD
uživatel/U1D1XD
vaniš/U1V1XD
varnsdorf/H1
velitel/U1D1XD
veslař/U1XD
vesničan/P1D1XD
videomagnetofon/H1
vinš/U1V1XD
vlekař/U1XD
vodochody/D1
volant/H1
volič/U1XD
vydavatel/U1D1XD
vyjednávač/U1XD
vykupitel/U1D1XD
vyzyvatel/U1D1XD
vyšetřovatel/U1D1XD
vzdor/H1
výhon/H1
výsek/H1
výškař/U1XD
věšák/H1
zahrádkář/U1XD
zakladatel/U1D1XD
zdvih/H1
zednář/U1XD
zeman/P1I1D1XD
zpravodaj/U1V1XD
zprostředkovatel/U1D1XD
zábor/H1
záskok/H1
zřízenec/U1XD
zůstavitel/U1D1XD
úderník/P1I1H1XD
ústup/H1
čečenec/U1XD
čin/H1
čtvrtfinalista/P1D1XD
říman/P1D1V1XD
šenkýř/U1XD
šerm/H1
španěl/P1D1V1XD
šroubovák/H1
šulc/U1V1XD
švec/U2V1
žid/P1D1N1XD
žold/H1
říčany/D1
vodňany/D1
volary/D1H1Q1
